Kentucky statutes. TITLE LI Unified Juvenile Code
CHAPTER 610 Procedural Matters
610.295.
Detention costs — Assessment against parent after hearing — Payments when adjudication based on status offense or public offense — Payment schedule and discharge.

Any statute to the contrary notwithstanding, detention costs shall not be assessed by a court against a parent unless the court has conducted a hearing and has determined:

That the child has previously been adjudicated as a habitual truant under KRS Chapter 630, a public offender under KRS Chapter 635, or a youthful offender under KRS Chapter 640, and now stands adjudicated guilty of a subsequent habitual truancy or public offense, or is now being considered for transfer to the Circuit Court for trial as a youthful offender; and

That the failure or neglect of the parent to properly supervise or control the child is a substantial contributing factor of the act or acts of the child upon which the proceeding is based; and

That the parent has the financial ability to pay any fees ordered.

Any orders for payment shall direct that payments be made to the fiscal court or legislative body of a consolidated local government, urban-county government, or charter government if detention is based upon adjudication related to a status offense and to the Department of Juvenile Justice if the adjudication is based upon a public offense or transfer as a youthful offender.

The fiscal court or legislative body of a consolidated local government, urban-county government, or charter government or the Department of Juvenile Justice, as appropriate, shall establish a payment schedule for parents against whom detention costs have been assessed, and may discharge any remaining portion of the debt upon proof of substantial change in circumstances of the parent.

The authority granted under subsection (3) of this section may be applied to all pre-existing court orders assessing detention costs in effect on July 15, 2002.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 263, § 5, effective July 15, 2002.

610.300.
Evidence in public offense investigations.

Physical evidence shall be obtained and utilized in the investigation of public offenses involving children in the same manner as it is obtained and utilized in the investigation of public offenses involving adults.

Except for fingerprint records, all records and physical evidence so obtained shall be surrendered to the court upon motion for good cause shown. All records, including fingerprint records, shall be subject to expungement in the manner provided in KRS

431.076

for circumstances specified therein.

The court shall, upon receipt of physical evidence, return any evidence which is not contraband and is not needed for further prosecution, to its lawful owner. The fingerprint cards created pursuant to KRS Chapters 600 to 645 shall be transferred pursuant to KRS

17.110

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 49, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 35, effective April 10, 1988; 1998, ch. 606, § 31, effective July 15, 1998.

610.310.
Medical treatment for child.

When the mental or physical health of any child before the juvenile court requires it, the court may order the child to be placed in a public or private hospital or institution for examination, evaluation, treatment, or care by a health officer, comprehensive care center, children’s clinic, or any reputable physician or psychologist who will conduct the examination. The cabinet and the Department of Juvenile Justice may furnish services under agreements with the individual juvenile courts. For this purpose, any county judge/executive or chief executive officer of an urban-county or charter county government may enter into a contract on behalf of his or her county with the cabinet or the Department of Juvenile Justice for the furnishings of these services.

The court may order or consent to necessary medical treatment, including surgical procedures, except for the purpose of abortion, electroshock therapy or psychosurgery as provided in KRS Chapter 645, or sterilization, after a hearing conducted to determine the necessity of such treatment or procedure. In making the order, the court may take into consideration the religious beliefs and practices of the child and his parents or guardian. Reasonable notice, taking into account any emergency circumstances, shall be provided to the parents, guardian or person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child to enable them to attend the hearing.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 50, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 36, effective April 10, 1988; 2000, ch. 534, § 10, effective July 14, 2000.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The language of subsection (2) of this section which permits a court to consider the religious beliefs of a child and his parents or guardian prior to ordering medical treatment for the child does not provide a lesser standard of protection for one group of children.

OAG 94-34

.

610.320.
Juvenile record and juvenile docket — Disclosure of information in court and police records concerning juvenile prohibited — Exceptions — Use of juvenile records in court.

A special record book shall be kept by the court for all cases, to be known as the “juvenile record,” and the docket or calendar of such cases shall be called the “juvenile docket.”

No probation officer, nor employee of a probation officer, shall, without the consent of the District Judge sitting in juvenile session, divulge or communicate to any persons other than the court, law enforcement, the Department of Juvenile Justice, an officer of the court interested in the case, a member of the advisory board of the court, or a representative of the cabinet, any information obtained pursuant to the discharge of his duties, nor shall any record of the action of the probation officer be made public except by leave of the District Judge; provided, that nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the probation officer from divulging or communicating such information to the court, to his colleagues or superiors in his own department, or to another probation officer having a direct interest in the record or social history of the child.

All law enforcement and court records regarding children who have not reached their eighteenth birthday shall not be opened to scrutiny by the public, except that a separate public record shall be kept by the clerk of the court which shall be accessible to the public for court records, limited to the petition, order of the adjudication, and disposition in juvenile delinquency proceedings concerning a child who is fourteen (14) years of age or older at the time of the commission of the offense, and who is adjudicated a juvenile delinquent for the commission of an offense that would constitute a capital offense or a Class A, B, or C felony if the juvenile were an adult, or any offense involving a deadly weapon, or an offense wherein a deadly weapon is used or displayed.

Release of the child’s treatment, medical, mental, or psychological records is prohibited unless presented as evidence in Circuit Court. Release of any records resulting from the child’s prior abuse and neglect under Title IV-E or Title IV-B of the Federal Social Security Act is also prohibited. Otherwise, the law enforcement records shall be made available to the child, family, guardian, or legal representative of the child involved. The records shall also be made available to the court, probation officers, prosecutors, the Department of Juvenile Justice, and law enforcement agencies or representatives of the cabinet. Records, limited to the child’s adjudication of delinquency, and disposition of a criminal activity covered by KRS

610.345

, shall also be made available to public or private elementary and secondary school administrative, transportation, and counseling personnel, and to any teacher to whose class the student has been assigned for instruction, subject to the provisions of KRS

610.340

and

610.345

.

Subject to the Kentucky Rules of Evidence, juvenile court records of adjudications of guilt of a child for an offense which would be a felony if committed by an adult shall be admissible in court at any time the child is tried as an adult, or after the child becomes an adult, at any subsequent criminal trial relating to that same person. Juvenile court records made available pursuant to this section may be used for impeachment purposes during a criminal trial, and may be used during the sentencing phase of a criminal trial. However, the fact that a juvenile has been adjudicated delinquent of an offense which would be a felony if the child had been an adult shall not be used in finding the child to be a persistent felony offender based upon that adjudication.

This section shall not relieve the probation officer or peace officer from divulging such facts as a witness in a trial or hearing involving any cases falling under KRS Chapters 600 to 645 or the production of juvenile records for use in the trial or proceedings.

This section shall not prohibit release of information regarding juvenile proceedings in the District Court which do not reveal the identity of the child or its parents or guardians, or which relate to the child’s eligibility for services under Title IV-E or IV-B of the Federal Social Security Act. Release of the child’s treatment, medical, mental, or psychological records is prohibited unless presented as evidence in Circuit Court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 51, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 37, effective April 10, 1988; 1996, ch. 358, § 36, effective July 1, 1996 and July 15, 1997; 1998, ch. 493, § 15, effective April 10, 1998; 1998, ch. 606, § 22, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 182, § 68, effective July 12, 2006.

610.330.
Expungement of offenses and proceedings from juvenile court records.

Any child who has been adjudicated as coming within the purview of KRS Chapter 630, 635, or 645, but not KRS Chapter 620 or 640, may petition the court for the expungement of offenses from his or her juvenile court record. He or she shall be informed of such right at the time of adjudication.

The court on its own motion, or on the motion of a probation officer of the court, a representative of the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet, or any other interested person, may initiate expungement proceedings concerning the record of any child who has been under the jurisdiction of the court.

Expungement shall not be granted if:

There are any proceedings pending or being instituted against the child;

The offense is a sex crime, as defined in KRS

17.500

; or

The offense would classify a person as a violent offender under KRS

439.3401

.

A petition may seek the expungement from the juvenile court record of:

Misdemeanors, violations, or status offenses;

A single felony; or

A series of felonies arising from a single incident.

The petition shall be filed or the court order entered no sooner than two (2) years after the date of termination of the court’s jurisdiction over the person, or two (2) years after his or her unconditional release from commitment to the Department of Juvenile Justice or the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or a public or private agency, except that the two (2) year period may be waived if the court finds that such extraordinary circumstances exist with regard to the petitioner as to make the waiver advisable.

Upon the filing of a petition or entering of a court order, the court shall set a date for a hearing and shall notify the county attorney and anyone else whom the court or the child, his or her parents, relatives, guardian, or custodian has reason to believe may have relevant information related to the expungement of the record.

The court may order the adjudication vacated and all records expunged in the petitioner’s case in the custody of the court and any of these records in the custody of any other agency or official, including law enforcement and public or private elementary and secondary school records, unless at the hearing the county attorney establishes that the child or offense is ineligible for expungement under subsections (1) to (4) of this section

Upon the entry of an order to expunge the records, the proceedings in the case shall be deemed never to have occurred and all index references shall be deleted and the person and court may properly reply that no record exists with respect to such person upon any inquiry in the matter. The person whose record is expunged shall not have to disclose the fact of the record or any matter relating thereto on an application for employment, credit, or other type of application.

If a court dismisses a petition against a child or finds a child not delinquent in a juvenile proceeding, the court shall concurrently order the record of the proceeding expunged. The order expunging the proceedings shall not require any action by the child.

Copies of the order shall be sent to each agency or official named therein.

Inspection of the records included in the order may thereafter be permitted by the court only upon petition by the person who is the subject of such records, and only to those persons named in such petition.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 52, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 38, effective April 10, 1988; 1996, ch. 358, § 37, effective July 15, 1997; 1998, ch. 426, § 615, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 443, § 20, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 663, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 87, § 20, effective July 15, 2008; 2017 ch. 112, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

610.340.
Confidentiality of juvenile court records.

Unless a specific provision of KRS Chapters 600 to 645 specifies otherwise, all juvenile court records of any nature generated pursuant to KRS Chapters 600 to 645 by any agency or instrumentality, public or private, shall be deemed to be confidential and shall not be disclosed except to the child, parent, victims, or other persons authorized to attend a juvenile court hearing pursuant to KRS

610.070

unless ordered by the court for good cause.

Juvenile court records which contain information pertaining to arrests, petitions, adjudications, and dispositions of a child may be disclosed to victims or other persons authorized to attend a juvenile court hearing pursuant to KRS

610.070

.

Release of the child’s treatment, medical, mental, or psychological records is prohibited unless presented as evidence in Circuit Court. Any records resulting from the child’s prior abuse and neglect under Title IV-E or Title IV-B of the Federal Social Security Act shall not be disclosed to victims or other persons authorized to attend a juvenile court hearing pursuant to KRS 610.070.

Victim access under this subsection to juvenile court records shall include access to records of adjudications that occurred prior to July 15, 1998.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to public officers or employees engaged in the investigation of and in the prosecution of cases under KRS Chapters 600 to 645 or other portions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes. Any record obtained pursuant to this subsection shall be used for official use only, shall not be disclosed publicly, and shall be exempt from disclosure under the Open Records Act, KRS

61.870

to

61.884

.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any peace officer, as defined in KRS

446.010

, who is engaged in the investigation or prosecution of cases under KRS Chapters 600 to 645 or other portions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes. Any record obtained pursuant to this subsection shall be used for official use only, shall not be disclosed publicly, and shall be exempt from disclosure under the Open Records Act, KRS

61.870

to

61.884

.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to employees of the Department of Juvenile Justice or cabinet or its designees responsible for any services under KRS Chapters 600 to 645 or to attorneys for parties involved in actions relating to KRS Chapters 600 to 645 or other prosecutions authorized by the Kentucky Revised Statutes.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to records disclosed pursuant to KRS

610.320

or to public or private elementary and secondary school administrative, transportation, and counseling personnel, to any teacher or school employee with whom the student may come in contact, or to persons entitled to have juvenile records under KRS

610.345

, if the possession and use of the records is in compliance with the provisions of KRS

610.345

and this section.

No person, including school personnel, shall disclose any confidential record or any information contained therein except as permitted by this section or other specific section of KRS Chapters 600 to 645, or except as permitted by specific order of the court.

No person, including school personnel, authorized to obtain records pursuant to KRS Chapters 600 to 645 shall obtain or attempt to obtain confidential records to which he is not entitled or for purposes for which he is not permitted to obtain them pursuant to KRS Chapters 600 to 645.

No person, including school personnel, not authorized to obtain records pursuant to KRS Chapters 600 to 645 shall obtain or attempt to obtain records which are made confidential pursuant to KRS Chapters 600 to 645 except upon proper motion to a court of competent jurisdiction.

No person shall destroy or attempt to destroy any record required to be kept pursuant to KRS Chapters 600 to 645 unless the destruction is permitted pursuant to KRS Chapters 600 to 645 and is authorized by the court upon proper motion and good cause for the destruction being shown.

As used in this section the term “KRS Chapters 600 to 645” includes any administrative regulations which are lawfully promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapters 600 to 645.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a crime victim from speaking publicly after the adjudication about his or her case on matters within his or her knowledge or on matters disclosed to the victim during any aspect of a juvenile court proceeding.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 53, effective July 1, 1987; 1996, ch. 358, § 38, effective July 1, 1996 and July 15, 1997; 1998, ch. 493, § 16, effective April 10, 1998; 1998, ch. 606, § 23, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 182, § 69, effective July 12, 2006; 2011, ch. 2, § 105, effective June 8, 2011; 2013, ch. 124, § 6, effective June 25, 2013.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/12/2006). This statute, as amended by 2006 Ky. Acts ch. 182, sec. 69, contained an internal reference in subsection (3) to “KRS

446.010

(24).” Under KRS 7.136(1)(e), this reference has been changed in codification to “KRS

446.010

(25)” by the Reviser of Statutes to reflect the insertion of a new subsection (24) in KRS 446.010 and the resulting renumbering of succeeding subsections in 2006 Ky. Acts ch. 149, sec. 237.

610.342.
Full access to all records relating to a child for that child’s attorney — Enforcement by court order.

Any statute to the contrary notwithstanding, an attorney representing a child in any proceeding under KRS Chapters 600 to 645 or in any adult criminal proceeding shall have full access to all records, including juvenile records, held by law enforcement, courts, social work agencies, or any other record, public or private, relating to that child which the attorney believes is necessary to the representation of that child.

All courts shall enforce the provisions of subsection (1) of this section through appropriate orders, upon request of an attorney representing a child in any proceeding specified in subsection (1) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 182, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

610.345.
School superintendent or principal to be notified when child found guilty or when petition is filed — Disclosure of records — Provision of offense history to school superintendent.

When a child is adjudicated guilty of an offense which classifies him or her as a youthful offender, the judge in the court in which the matter was tried shall direct the clerk to notify the superintendent of the public school district in which the child is enrolled or the principal of any private elementary or secondary school which the child attends of the adjudication and the petition and disposition of the case. The name of the complainant shall be deleted. The court shall direct the appropriate prosecuting entity to give the school district or the school a statement of facts in the case. The superintendent shall notify the principal of the school in which the child is enrolled.

When a child is adjudicated guilty of an offense which would classify him or her as a violent offender under KRS

439.3401

, or be a felony under KRS Chapter 218A, 508, 510, or 527 if committed by an adult, but which would not classify him or her as a youthful offender, the judge in the court in which the matter was tried shall direct the clerk to notify within five (5) days of the order the superintendent of the public school district in which the child is enrolled or the principal of any private elementary or secondary school which the child attends of the charge, the adjudication, and the disposition of the case. The name of the complainant shall be deleted. The court shall authorize the county attorney to give the school district or the school a statement of facts in the case. The superintendent shall notify the principal of the school in which the child is enrolled.

When a petition is filed against a child, or a child is adjudicated guilty of an offense that would be a felony or misdemeanor if committed by an adult, and the misdemeanor involves a controlled substance or the possession, carrying, or use of a deadly weapon, or physical injury to another person, the judge in the court in which the matter is considered shall direct the clerk to notify the superintendent of the public school district in which the child is enrolled or the principal of any private elementary or secondary school that the child attends of the charge, the adjudication, and the disposition of the case. The notification shall be made within twenty-four (24) hours of the time when the petition is filed. The name of the complainant shall be deleted. The court shall authorize the county attorney to give the school district or the school a statement of the facts in the case, not to include the complainant’s name. If the petition is dismissed, all records of the incident or notification created in the school district or the school under this subsection shall be destroyed, and shall not be included in the child’s school records.

Notice of adjudication to a district superintendent referenced in subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall be released by the superintendent to the principal. A principal of a public or private school receiving notice of adjudication shall release the information to employees of the school having responsibility for classroom instruction or counseling of the child and may release it to other school personnel as described in subsection (5) of this section, but the information shall otherwise be confidential and shall not be shared by school personnel with any other person or agency except as may otherwise be required by law. The notification in writing of the nature of the offense committed by the child and any probation requirements shall not become a part of the child’s student record.

Records or information disclosed pursuant to this section shall be limited to records of that student’s criminal petition and the disposition thereof covered by this section, shall be subject to the provisions of KRS

610.320

and

610.340

, and shall not be disclosed to any other person, including school personnel, except to a district superintendent, public or private elementary and secondary school administrative, transportation, and counseling personnel, and to any teacher or school employee with whom the student may come in contact. This section shall not authorize the disclosure of any other juvenile record or information relating to the child.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall provide a child’s offense history information pursuant to this section to the superintendent of the local school district in which the child, who is committed to the department, is placed.

Records or information received by the school pursuant to this section shall be kept in a locked file, when not in use, to be opened only on permission of the administrator.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 358, § 34, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 493, § 17, effective April 10, 1998; 1998, ch. 606, § 182, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 257, § 19, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 185, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2006, ch. 182, § 70, effective July 12, 2006.

610.350.
Fees.

In proceedings in the juvenile session of the District Court, no court fees shall be charged against, and no witness fees shall be allowed to, any party to a petition. No public officer shall be entitled to receive any fee from the service of process or for attendance in court in any such proceedings. All other persons acting under orders of the court may be paid for service of process and attendance as witnesses. The payments for fees provided by law for like services in civil cases in the Circuit Court are to be made out of the county treasury. The county or state may compensate any officer or person in the amount prescribed by law for the transportation of a child to a place where he will be detained or placed or the return of any child to the jurisdiction of the court, and funds for this purpose may be appropriated and paid by the fiscal court.

For the purpose of paying salaries and expenses necessary to carry out the purposes of KRS Chapters 600 to 645, the fiscal court of any county, or urban-county council of an urban-county government, may levy taxes and make appropriations within constitutional limitations. The legislative body of any city also is authorized to appropriate funds to assist the county in carrying out the purposes of KRS Chapters 600 to 645, including providing facilities for custody and care of children coming within the purview of KRS Chapters 600 to 645.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 54, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 39, effective April 10, 1988.

610.360.
Court costs.

Court costs commensurate with those in District or Circuit Court, as appropriate, shall be charged by the juvenile session of District Court against juveniles who are informally adjusted or found delinquent because of status offenses or public offenses and by the Circuit Court against juveniles who are found to be youthful offenders.

Where possible, court costs shall be assessed against the child, but they may be assessed against the child’s parent or legal guardian.

Court costs shall not be assessed against a parent or guardian who is the complainant against the child or who has been the victim of the child’s acts.

In the case of children who have been committed, court costs shall not be assessed against the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet.

The court may require juveniles to pay court costs on the installment plan or in any other manner provided for fines by KRS Chapter 534 or to engage in community labor at state minimum wage rates to pay off their court costs. Labor to pay court costs shall be in addition to community labor ordered for other purposes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 358, § 35, effective July 15, 1997; 1998, ch. 443, § 21, effective July 15, 1998.

610.990.
Penalty.

Any person who intentionally violates any of the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 55, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 40, effective April 10, 1988.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Juvenile Court, § 32.20.

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Support of Children (On Dissolution), § 27.13.